Maine, session 132, LD760.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
CONCEPT DRAFT
SUMMARY
This bill is a concept draft pursuant to Joint Rule 208.
This bill would establish the Maine Common Interest Ownership Act based on the 2021
version of the Uniform Common Interest Ownership Act, the text of which may be found
here: https://legislature.maine.gov/doc/11388.
Page 1 - 132LR2009(01)